Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2480
Bonds and property; tax exempt; when.

(1) All bonds of an agency are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

(2) The property of an agency, including any pro rata share of any property owned by an agency in conjunction with any other person, is declared to be public property of a governmental subdivision of the state. Such property and the income of an agency shall be exempt from all taxes of the state or any municipality or other political subdivision of the state and shall be exempt from all special assessments of any participating municipality if used for a public purpose.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 80;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 15.